Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 47.26.084 and 2011 c 120 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The transportation improvement account is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund. The intent of the program is to:(a) Improve mobility of people and goods in Washington state by supporting economic development and environmentally responsive solutions to our statewide transportation system needs;(b) Improve the arterial street system of the state by improving mobility and safety while supporting an environment essential to the quality of life of the citizens of the state; and(c) Maintain, preserve, and extend the life and utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services.(2) ((The small city program, as provided for in RCW 47.26.115, is implemented within the transportation improvement account.(3))) Within one year after board approval of an application for funding, a county, city, or transportation benefit district shall provide written certification to the board of the pledged local and/or private funding. Funds allocated to an applicant that does not certify its funding within one year after approval may be reallocated by the board.Sec. 2. RCW 47.26.086 and 2011 c 120 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:Transportation improvement account projects selected for funding programs after fiscal year 1995 are governed by the requirements of this section.The board shall allocate funds from the account by June 30th of each year for the ensuing fiscal year to urban counties, cities ((with a population of five thousand and over)), and to transportation benefit districts. Projects may include, but are not limited to, multiagency projects and arterial improvement projects in fast-growing areas. The board shall endeavor to provide geographical diversity in selecting improvement projects to be funded from the account.To be eligible to receive these funds, a project must be consistent with the Growth Management Act, the Clean Air Act including conformity, and the Commute Trip Reduction Law and consideration must have been given to the project's relationship, both actual and potential, with the statewide rail passenger program and rapid mass transit. Projects must be consistent with any adopted high capacity transportation plan, must consider existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels attributable to economic development or growth and all modes of transportation and safety, and must be partially funded by local government or private contributions, or a combination of such contributions. Priority consideration shall be given to those projects with the greatest percentage of local or private contribution, or both.Within one year after board approval of an application for funding, the lead agency shall provide written certification to the board of the pledged local and private funding for the phase of the project approved. Funds allocated to an applicant that does not certify its funding within one year after approval may be reallocated by the board.Sec. 3. RCW 47.26.121 and 1996 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is hereby created a transportation improvement board of ((twenty-one))21 members, six of whom shall be county members and six of whom shall be city members. The remaining members shall be: (a) One representative appointed by the governor who shall be a state employee with responsibility for transportation policy, planning, or funding; (b) two representatives from the department of transportation; (c) two representatives of public transit systems; (d) a private sector representative; (e) a member representing the ports; (f) a member representing ((nonmotorized))active transportation; and (g) a member representing special needs transportation.(2) Of the county members of the board, one shall be a county engineer or public works director; one shall be the executive director of the county road administration board; one shall be a county planning director or planning manager; one shall be a county executive, councilmember, or commissioner from a county with a population of ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000 or more; one shall be a county executive, councilmember, or commissioner of a county who serves on the board of a public transit system; and one shall be a county executive, councilmember, or commissioner from a county with a population of less than ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000. All county members of the board, except the executive director of the county road administration board, shall be appointed. Not more than one county member of the board shall be from any one county. No more than two of the three county elected officials may represent counties located in either the eastern or western part of the state as divided north and south by the summit of the Cascade mountains.(3) Of the city members of the board one shall be a chief city engineer, public works director, or other city employee with responsibility for public works activities, of a city with a population of ((twenty thousand))20,000 or more; one shall be a chief city engineer, public works director, or other city employee with responsibility for public works activities, of a city of less than ((twenty thousand))20,000 population; one shall be a city planning director or planning manager; one shall be a mayor, commissioner, or city councilmember of a city with a population of ((twenty thousand))20,000 or more; one shall be a mayor, commissioner, or city councilmember of a city who serves on the board of a public transit system; and one shall be a mayor, commissioner, or councilmember of a city of less than ((twenty thousand))20,000 population. All of the city members shall be appointed. Not more than one city member of the board shall be from any one city. No more than two of the three city-elected officials may represent cities located in either the eastern or western part of the state as divided north and south by the summit of the Cascade mountains.(4) Of the transit members, at least one shall be a general manager, executive director, or transit director of a public transit system in an urban area with a population over ((two hundred thousand))200,000 and at least one representative from a rural or small urban transit system in an area with a population less than ((two hundred thousand))200,000.(5) The private sector member shall be a citizen with business, management, and transportation related experience and shall be active in a business community-based transportation organization.(6) The port member shall be a commissioner or senior staff person of a public port.(7) The ((nonmotorized))active transportation member shall be a citizen with a demonstrated interest and involvement with ((a nonmotorized))an active transportation group.(8) The specialized transportation member shall be a citizen with a demonstrated interest and involvement with a statewide specialized needs transportation group.(9) Appointments of county, city, Washington department of transportation, transit, port, ((nonmotorized))active transportation, special needs transportation, and private sector representatives shall be made by the secretary of the department of transportation. Appointees shall be chosen from a list of two persons for each position nominated by the Washington state association of counties for county members, the association of Washington cities for city members, the Washington state transit association for the transit members, and the Washington public ports association for the port member. The private sector, ((nonmotorized))active transportation, and special needs members shall be sought through classified advertisements in selected newspapers collectively serving all urban areas of the state, and other appropriate means. Persons applying for the private sector, ((nonmotorized))active transportation, or special needs transportation member position must provide a letter of interest and a resume to the secretary of the department of transportation. In the case of a vacancy, the appointment shall be only for the remainder of the unexpired term in which the vacancy has occurred. A vacancy shall be deemed to have occurred on the board when any member elected to public office completes that term of office or is removed therefrom for any reason or when any member employed by a political subdivision terminates such employment for whatsoever reason or when a private sector, ((nonmotorized))active transportation, or special needs transportation member resigns or is unable or unwilling to serve.(10) Appointments shall be for terms of four years. Terms of all appointed members shall expire on June 30th of even-numbered years. The initial term of appointed members may be for less than four years. No appointed member may serve more than two consecutive four-year terms.(11) The board shall elect a chair from among its members for a two-year term.(12) Expenses of the board shall be paid in accordance with RCW 47.26.140.(13) For purposes of this section((, "public)):(a) "Active transportation" means forms of pedestrian mobility including walking or running, the use of a mobility assistive device such as a wheelchair, bicycling, and cycling irrespective of the number of wheels, and the use of small personal devices such as foot scooters or skateboards. "Active transportation" includes both traditional and electric-assisted bicycles and other devices.(b) "Public transit system" means a city-owned transit system, county transportation authority, metropolitan municipal corporation, public transportation benefit area, or regional transit authority.Sec. 4. RCW 47.26.140 and 2011 c 120 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:The transportation improvement board shall appoint an executive director, who shall serve at its pleasure and whose salary shall be set by the board, and may employ additional staff as it deems appropriate. All costs associated with staff, together with travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, shall be paid from the ((public transportation systems account and the)) transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund as determined by the biennial appropriation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 47.26.170 (Long-range arterial construction planningâArterial inventory data) and 2005 c 319 s 131, 1994 c 179 s 16, 1988 c 167 s 19, 1984 c 7 s 156, 1971 ex.s. c 291 s 2, & 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 23; and(2) RCW 47.26.300 (Bicycle routesâLegislative declaration) and 1974 ex.s. c 141 s 1.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---